Tennessee, session 114, HB0643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 68, Chapter 1, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) The commissioner of health shall create programs designed to enhance
access to dental services in rural and underserved areas. The programs may include
cooperative agreements with dental schools, enhancements and upgrades to
departmental clinic sites, provider incentive programs, restorative and other specialty
dental services, programs supporting dental care for seniors, training opportunities for
providers, and support for high technology and telecommunications efforts.
(b) All programs created by the commissioner of health pursuant to subsection
(a) are subject to the approval of the commissioner of finance and administration.
SECTION 2. This act is not an appropriation of funds, and funds shall not be obligated
or expended pursuant to this act unless the funds are specifically appropriated by the general
appropriations act.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0643
001767
- 1 -